New York, session 2025-2026, S3179.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 37-0119 of the environmental conservation law, as 2 added by chapter 596 of the laws of 2021, is renumbered section 37-0123. 3 § 2. Paragraph a of subdivision 3 of section 37-0123 of the environ- 4 mental conservation law, as added by chapter 596 of the laws of 2021 and 5 such section as renumbered by section one of this act, is amended to 6 read as follows: 7 a. "Coal tar" means a viscous substance obtained by the destructive 8 distillation of coal, including but not limited to ethylene cracked 9 residues or steam cracked residues, and containing levels of polycyclic 10 aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs) in excess of [ten] one thousand milligrams 11 per kilogram. 12 § 3. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 13 law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03930-04-6